
 Dust in Spiral Galaxies HST and ISO Results Read the on the HST and ISO GIF (82k) of the press-release montage full-resolution TIFF GIF (142K), or JPEG full-resolution TIFF GIF JPEG (53K) abstract background and technique summary of results extinction curves cumulative and differential distributions ISO project I NASA Infrared Telescope Facility . Back to Bill Keel's home page Ray White's home page 
 arXiv:astro-ph/9908269v1 24 Aug 1999 Galaxy Collisions Curtis Struck Dept of Physics and Astronomy , Iowa State University E-mail: curt@iastate.edu Contents 1. Introduction to Colliding Galaxies. 1.1 Overview 1.2 Orders of Magnitude 1.3 Background and Early History 1.4 The Importance of Collisions 1.5 Nature's Galaxy Experiments 2. Some Phenomenology: What's Out There? 2.1 2.2 Physical Classification? 2.3 The Naming of Things 3. Transient Events I: Some Wave Morphologies and their Causes (Yxx). 3.1 Ring galaxies (YDe0) 3.2 Symmetric Caustic Waves 3.3 3.4 From Rings to Spirals 3.5 Tidal Spirals and Oculars (YDx+) 3.6 Fan Galaxies and One Arms (YDx-) 3.7 Gas vs. Stars in Waves 4. Transient Events II: Death and Transfiguration. 4.1 Transient Mass Transfer and Bridges 4.1.1 4.1.2 Models and Splash Physics 4.1.3 4.1.4 4.2 Complete Collisional Disruption 4.3 Transient Summary 5. Coming Back (Ixx, Oxx) 5.1 Dynamical Friction - Bringing it Back - Background and history - Recent Developments 5.2 5.2.1 Sinking satellites 5.2.2 Bobbing satellites 5.3 Halo Braking 5.4 5.5 Shells and Ripples 5.6 Induced Bars 5.6.1 Collisional Bar Formation 5.6.2 Effects of Induced Bars 5.6.3 5.7 Intermediate Summary 6. Mergers - All the Way Back (Oxx) 6.1 Overview and Historical Highlights 6.2 Major Merger Dynamics 6.2.1 Violent Relaxation 6.2.2 Gas Funneling 6.3 Minor mergers: disk heating and aging 6.4 New disks 6.4.1 Ellipticals with Disks 6.4.2 6.4.3 Polar Ring Galaxies 6.5 Multiple Mergers 7. Induced Star Formation 7.1 Color, H a 7.2 Spectral Line Diagnostics 7.2.1 SF Histories 7.2.2 7.3 SF Region Morphologies 7.4 Mechanisms and Modes 7.4.1 Star Formation Enhancements 7.4.2 Star Formation Suppression 8. Active Galactic Nuclei in Collisional Galaxies 8.1 Phenomenology 8.2 Fueling Mechanisms 9. Environments and Redshift Dependence 9.1 Groups and Compact Groups 9.2 Dense Clusters 9.2.1 cD Galaxies 9.2.2 9.2.3 9.2.4 Cluster-Cluster Collisions 9.3 High-Redshift Collisions 10. Conclusions Acknowledgements References Tables Figures and Captions 
 M31 - the Andromeda Galaxy HST image caption Paul Hodge's Atlas of the Andromeda Galaxy G148 432 202 G187 236 102 G158 383 388 G189 216 312 G161 372 59 G190 211 203 G165 358 342 G194 198 400 G167 348 17 G198 158 391 G168 349 140 G199 133 464 G169 348 403 G203 104 427 G170 341 75 G204 101 304 G174 334 333 G205 91 470 G175 327 156 G207 88 354 G177 327 202 G208 71 275 G182 284 78 G212 61 106 G184 264 154 G215 51 109 G185 259 227 G218 32 91 M32 and M110 . This shows an area over a degree across. Messier gallery Galaxies Image gallery UA Astronomy Bill Keel's home page 2001 
 Spiral Galaxies evolution of the galaxies Examples of Spiral Galaxies M100 (Ref) (Ref) Properties of Spiral Galaxies 9 12 11 The Spiral Structure spiral structure (Ref) morphing (Ref) Gas and Dust 
 Andromeda Galaxy Home | X-Objects | Stars | Habitability | Life | Š , Larger more ). APOD Breaking News AUI NRAO NSF Larger jumbo illustrations. more Hubble Space Telescope elliptical galaxy Z. Levay R. van der Marel A. Mellinger ; STScI ESA NASA Larger jumbo illustrations. more spiral galaxies Sol Earth Solar System ). A Large Spiral Galaxy Andromeda Mirach Š Jason Ware , www.galaxyphoto.com Larger more ). APOD -- more below). WISE UCLA , CalTech JPL NASA Larger jumbo more Messier Catalogue , REU program NOAO / AURA / NSF Larger red, green, and blue composite image. NOAO ). IPAC NASA Larger infrared image. IPAC portrait photo ). B.J. Mochejska Warsaw University ), The DIRECT Project FLWO MDM Larger blue, visual, and infrared, APOD CfA UCSC KPNO larger blue and infrared image. UCSC UCOLICK more ). more discussion CalTech NASA Larger jumbo ultraviolet images. APOD GALEX Spitzer Space Telescope Messier 32 more ). CfA JPL NASA larger infrared image M32 more NASA ). Stefan Immler , Swift , GSFC NASA Larger UV image. more Herschel XMM-Newton ). Herschel PACS SPIRE XMM-Newton EPIC MPE ESA Larger jumbo more M31 Milky Way Mutch et al, 2011 David Shiga, New Scientist , May 20, 2011 Active Galactic Nucleus STScI NASA Larger 2012 color images. APOD STScI Hubble ; and ). Stephen Murray , Larger image. CXC ; CXC NASA Larger x-ray image. CXC M32 M110 Very Large Galactic Halo halo Sky and Telescope ). STScI NASA Larger image. 2003 2007 more STScI NASA Larger image. STScI APOD more Old but Bright Globular Cluster G1 Local Group SagDEG Kenneth Mighell , James D. Neill Wendy Freedman , Columbia University Carnegie , STScI NASA Larger image. G1 STScI APOD first stars 47 Tucanae STScI ). Satellite Galaxies Eva Grebel , University of Basel , NOAO / AURA / NSF , Keck Observatory Larger illustration. more more McConnachie et al, 2009 ; PAndAS Larger composite illustration . Triangulum more Canada-France Hawaii Telescope Triangulum PAndAS news release New Scientist , September 2, 2009 McConnachie et al, 2009 Martin et al, 2009 Courtesy of PAndAS Larger more ). more Other Information . arXiv.org Physics e-Print archive . Andromeda Andromeda 
 Galaxies Introduction stars . Our Sun is one of billions of stars in a galaxy called the Milky Way , and the Milky Way is only one of billions of galaxies in the Universe Magellanic Clouds , only a few can be seen without a telescope Andromeda galaxy Click on the links below to find out more about galaxies. Formation of Galaxies   The Milky Way  Spiral Galaxies Elliptical Galaxies     Irregular Galaxies     Tuning Fork Diagram    Authors: Carolyn Brinkworth and Claire Thomas Last updated: July 2001 
 Home About GALEX Overview Basics Team Newsroom Press Releases Feature Stories Status Updates Media Gallery Images Videos Education For Kids For Teachers Researcher Resources Data Releases Guest Investigators Current Status Publications Documentation TDS Alerts FAQ GALEXFest GALEX CAUSE Quick Links GALEX CAUSE GALEXFest 2012 : A Conference in Pasadena on Sep 4-7, 2012 Publications : View a list of GALEX-related journal publications. Current Status GALEX Tools FAQ Featured Image Site Search GALEX Recent News Press Release: NASA Decommissions Its Galaxy Hunter Spacecraft NASA has turned off its Galaxy Evolution Explorer after a decade of operations in which the venerable space telescope used its ultraviolet vision to study hundreds of millions of galaxies across 10 billion years of cosmic time. Full Story From National Astronomical Observatory of Japan: Discovery of a Blue Supergiant Star Born in the Wild A duo of astronomers, Dr. Youichi Ohyama (Institute of Astronomy and Astrophysics, Academia Sinica or ASIAA, Taiwan) and Dr. Ananda Hota (UM-DAE Centre for Excellence in the Basic Sciences or CBS, India), has discovered a Blue Supergiant star located far beyond our Milky Way Galaxy in the constellation Virgo. Full Story Feature: Gravity-Bending Find Leads to Kepler Meeting Einstein The light of a red star is warped and magnified by its dead-star companion, as detected by NASA's Kepler space telescope. Full Story Press Release: NASA's Galex Reveals the Largest-Known Spiral Galaxy The spectacular barred spiral galaxy NGC 6872 has ranked among the biggest stellar systems for decades. Now a team of astronomers from the United States, Chile and Brazil have crowned it the largest-known spiral based on archival data from NASA's Galaxy Evolution Explorer mission. Full Story Feature Story: The Helix Nebula: Bigger in Death than Life What was once a fairly average star, not much different than our sun, can be seen unraveling at the seams in this new image from the Spitzer and GALEX space telescopes. Full Story Press Release: NASA Lends Galaxy Evolution Explorer to Caltech NASA is lending the Galaxy Evolution Explorer (GALEX) to the California Institute of Technology (Caltech) in Pasadena, where the spacecraft will continue its exploration of the cosmos. Full Story From NASA's ASK Magazine: GALEX: Managing the Unexpected Explorers are among the lowest-cost missions flown by NASA, but they can pack a big scientific punch. Such is the case with the Galaxy Evolution Explorer, or GALEX, a mission designed to map the history of star formation over 80 percent of the age of the universe. Full Story Press Release: Black Hole Caught Red-Handed in a Stellar Homicide Astronomers have gathered the most direct evidence yet of a supermassive black hole shredding a star that wandered too close. Full Story Feature Story: Cosmic 'Leaf Blower' Robs Galaxy of Star-Making Fuel Supernova explosions and the jets of a monstrous black hole are scattering a galaxy's star-making gas like a cosmic leaf blower. Full Story Image Release: Cygnus Loop Nebula Wispy tendrils of hot dust and gas glow brightly in this ultraviolet image of the Cygnus Loop nebula, taken by NASA's Galaxy Evolution Explorer. Full Image and Caption Feature Story: NASA's Galaxy Evolution Explorer in Standby Mode NASA's Galaxy Evolution Explorer was placed in standby mode today as engineers prepare to end mission operations, nearly nine years after the telescope's launch. Full Story GALEX Announcement: GALEXFest Conference at Huntington Library, Sep. 4-7, 2012 Astronomers will gather at the historic Huntington Library and Gardens in Pasadena, California on September 4th through 7th, 2012 to celebrate over nine years of UV exploration with the Galaxy Evolution Explorer. Full Story From Harvard-Smithsonian Center for Astrophysics: The Spitzer Photo Atlas of Galactic "Train Wrecks" Five billion years from now, our Milky Way galaxy will collide with the Andromeda galaxy. This will mark a moment of both destruction and creation. Full Story Press Release: NASA's Galaxy Evolution Explorer Helps Confirm Nature of Dark Energy A five-year survey of 200,000 galaxies, stretching back seven billion years in cosmic time, has led to one of the best independent confirmations that dark energy is driving our universe apart at accelerating speeds. Full Story Feature Story: Ultraviolet Spotlight on Plump Stars in Tiny Galaxies Astronomers using NASA's Galaxy Evolution Explorer may be closer to knowing why some of the most massive stellar explosions ever observed occur in the tiniest of galaxies. Full Story Feature Story: NASA Telescope Ferrets Out Planet-Hunting Targets Astronomers have come up with a new way of identifying close, faint stars with NASA's Galaxy Evolution Explorer satellite. The technique should help in the hunt for planets that lie beyond our solar system, because nearby, hard-to-see stars could very well be home to the easiest-to-see alien planets. Full Story Feature Story: Giant Ultraviolet Rings Found in Resurrected Galaxies Astronomers have found mysterious, giant loops of ultraviolet light in aged, massive galaxies, which seem to have a second lease on life. Full Story Feature Story: Astronomers Discover Star-Studded Galaxy Tail NASA's Galaxy Evolution Explorer has discovered a galaxy tail studded with bright knots of new stars. The tail, which was created as the galaxy IC 3418 plunged into the neighboring Virgo cluster of galaxies, offers new insight into how stars form. Full Story GALEX Status Update: Space Telescope Moves on with One Detector Mission engineers and scientists with NASA's Galaxy Evolution Explorer, a space telescope that has been beaming back pictures of galaxies for three times its design lifespan, are no longer planning science observations around one of its two ultraviolet detectors. Full Story Galaxy Evolution Explorer International Year of Astronomy Video Dr Mark Seibert and Dr James Don Neill explain what GALEX does in this International Year of Astronomy Video Video Download and Caption Feature Story: Jurassic Space: Telescopes Probe Ancient Galaxies Near Us Imagine finding a living dinosaur in your backyard. Astronomers have found the astronomical equivalent of prehistoric life in our intergalactic backyard. Full Story GALEX Status Update: December 2, 2009 Engineers and scientists have several laboratory activities underway that are expected to aid in recovering the far-ultraviolet instrument on NASA's Galaxy Evolution Explorer. Full Story GALEX Status Update: August 21, 2009 Engineers and scientists are continuing to work on the recovery of the far-ultraviolet instrument on NASA's Galaxy Evolution Explorer. Full Story Press Release: Galaxies Demand a Stellar Recount For decades, astronomers have gone about their business of studying the cosmos with the assumption that stars of certain sizes form in certain quantities Full Story GALEX Status Update: July 9, 2009 Engineers and scientists are continuing the recovery procedure for the far-ultraviolet instrument on NASA's Galaxy Evolution Explorer. On May 29, the instrument experienced an overcurrent condition and shut down. Full Story GALEX Status Update: June 9, 2009 On May 29, the Galaxy Evolution Explorer's far-ultraviolet instrument reported an overcurrent condition and shut down. The project reviewed data from the incident and confirmed it had the same characteristics as three previous incidents occurring in 2005, 2006 and 2007. Full Story Feature Story: NASA's Galaxy-Exploring Mission Celebrates Sixth Anniversary NASA's Galaxy Evolution Explorer Mission marks its sixth anniversary studying galaxies beyond our Milky Way through its sensitive ultraviolet telescope, the only such far-ultraviolet detector in space. Full Story Image Release: The Extended Region Around the Planetary Nebula NGC 3242 This new image of the 'Ghost of Jupiter' is being released as part of the 'Around the World in 80 Telescopes' event for the International Year of Astronomy. Full Image and Caption Press Release: NASA Joins 'Around the World in 80 Telescopes' A collection of NASA missions will be involved in a live event Friday, April 3, that will allow the public to get an inside look at how these missions are run. "Around the World in 80 Telescopes" is a 24-hour webcast that is part of the "100 Hours of Astronomy" event for the International Year of Astronomy 2009. Full Story From National Geographic: Death of a Star GALEX captures a dying star hurtling through space, leaving a trail of glowing debris more than 13 light-years long. Watch Video Press Release: New Recipe for Dwarf Galaxies: Start with Leftover Gas There is more than one way to make a dwarf galaxy, and NASA's Galaxy Evolution Explorer has found a new recipe. Full Story Press Release: 'Ghost of Mirach' Materializes in Space Telescope Image NASA's Galaxy Evolution Explorer has lifted the veil off a ghost known to haunt the local universe, providing new insight into the formation and evolution of galaxies. Full Story GALEX Status Update: Jul. 1, 2008 NASA's Galaxy Evolution Explorer resumed nominal operations today, completing recovery from its June 13 shutdown, caused by an anomaly with the satellite's instrument processor. Full Story From University of Oxford: Ultraviolet Gives View Inside Real ‘Death Star’ Scientists have, for the first time, observed a flash of ultraviolet light from within a dying star giving vital evidence of how stars turn into supernovae. Full Story Feature Story: Galaxy Evolution Explorer Celebrates Five Years in Space Since its launch five years ago, the Galaxy Evolution Explorer (GALEX) has photographed hundreds of millions of galaxies in ultraviolet light. M106 is one of those galaxies, and from 22 million light years away, it strikes a pose in blue and gold for this new commemorative portrait. Full Story Press Release: Stellar Birth in the Galactic Wilderness A new image from NASA's Galaxy Evolution Explorer shows baby stars sprouting in the backwoods of a galaxy -- a relatively desolate region of space more than 100,000 light-years from the galaxy's bustling center. Full Story RSS Feed | Contacts | Site Map GALEX is a NASA mission managed by the Jet Propulsion Laboratory. 
 The Milky Way and Other Galaxies Contents Galactic Structure Period-Luminosity Relation for Variable Stars Cepheids RR-Lyrae Our Location Our Motion Deriving the Galactic Mass from the Rotation Curve Spiral Arms Density wave theory Transient spirals Supernova creating spiral arms Populations of Stars Population II Population I Galactic Center Other Galaxies Types of Galaxies Ellipticals Spirals Irregulars Positions Distances to Galaxies Masses of Galaxies Origin of Galaxies Clusters of Galaxies Local Group Virgo Cluster Coma Cluster Superclusters Steps to the Hubble Constant Distance scale ladder Rung 1 Distance to Sun Rung 2 Trigometric Parallax Rung 3 Spectroscopic Parallax Rung 4 Variables Period-Luminosity Relation Rung 5a Galaxy Luminosity vs. Another Bright Feature Rung 5b Luminosity or Size of Bright Feature Rung 6 Galaxy Luminosity and Inverse Square Law Rung 7 Hubble Law Photo Gallery of Galaxies Galactic Structure Index A. Period-Luminosity Relation for Variable Stars Cepheids Cepheids RR-Lyrae RR Lyrae average absolute B. Our Location Index globular clusters C. Our Motion D. Deriving the Galactic Mass from the Rotation Curve balance R M inside G Beyond Dark Matter E. Spiral Arms Index Differential rotation (different angular 5 x 10 Density wave theory Transient spirals Supernova creating spiral arms F. Populations of Stars Index Population II Population II --in spheroidal Population I Population I --in disk G. Galactic Center Index M31 M32 , Sombrero Galaxy, M87 Other Galaxies Index Galaxy A. Types of Galaxies Ellipticals Ellipticals --round or elliptical shapes. a) Much more random M32 M87 Spirals Spirals M31 M33 Irregulars Irregulars B. Positions Index C. Distances to Galaxies Steps to the Hubble Constant D. Masses of Galaxies E. Origin of Galaxies Index F. Clusters of Galaxies Local Group Virgo Cluster M87 Coma Cluster G. Superclusters Index Steps to the Hubble Constant Index no Rung 1 Index Rung 2 Index Rung 3 Index Rung 4 Index ~ 49 L M V = +0.6 Rung 5a Index Fisher-Tully relation L = 180 Faber-Jackson law = Rung 5b Index Rung 6 Index Hubble law H x Rung 7 Index Photo Gallery of Galaxies Index go to the galaxy picture gallery. Return to MAA Scholar page from N. Strobel last updated 17 Nov 95 University of Washington Astronomy Box 351580 
 GALAXIES French sites English sites ENGLISH SITES http://www.seds.org/messier/m-names.html * * * * * http://www.astro.princeton.edu/~frei/... * * * * http://www.galex.caltech.edu/ * * * * http://www.damtp.cam.ac.uk/user/gr/public... A nice generalistic sire on galaxies * * * http://galileo.as.utexas.edu/researc... Lecture notes about galaxies and the intergalactic medium. * * * * http://zebu.uoregon.edu/messier.html Messier object picture gallery. Please click and admire !!! * * * * * http://www.solarviews.com/cap/ds/mi... * * * http://www.aas.org/publications/baas... * * * http://adc.gsfc.nasa.gov/mw/ * * * * TOP OF PAGE FRENCH SITES http://www.cnrs.fr/Cnrspresse/n34... * * * http://www-obs.univ-lyon1.fr/~prugniel/french/galaxies_popular.html * * * http://www.cybersciences.com/C... * * * http://www.cybersciences.com... * * * http://www.obspm.fr/messier/f/... Everything about M94: A SAB galaxy. * * * http://www-obs.univ-lyon1.fr/~g... * * * http://www-obs.univ-lyon1.fr/~a... The nucleus of active galaxies. * * * TOP OF PAGE www.galacticsurf.net Check the webmaster's latest music project: ! 
 Globular Clusters in the Andromeda Galaxy --by Steve Gottlieb Mayall II (G1) Imaging Globular Clusters in M31 Data and Observing Notes M31-G002 = Mayall III M31-G035 = Bol 312 M31-G052 = Bol 005 M31-G058 = Bol 006 M31-G064 = Bol 012 M31-G073 = Bol 020 M31-G072 = Bol 019 M31-G078 = Bol 023 M31-G076 = Bol 338 M31-G087 = Bol 027 M31-G096 = Bol 034 M31-G119 = Bol 058 M31-G124 = Bol 063 M31-G148 = Bol 086 M31-G144 = Bol 082 M31-G150 = Bol 088 M31-G156 = Bol 094 M31-G172 = Bol 110 M31-G213 = Bol 158 M31-G219 = Mayall IV = Bol 358 M31-G222 = Bol 171 M31-G229 = Bol 178 M31-G230 = Bol 179 M31-G226 = Bol 174 M31-G233 = Bol 182 M31-G235 = Bol 185 M31-G244 = Bol 193 M31-G257 = Bol 206 M31-G256 = Bol 205 M31-G272 = Bol 218 M31-G280 = Bol 225 M31-G279 = Bol 224 M31-G286 = Bol 232 M31-G287 = Bol 233 M31-G302 = Bol 240 M31-G305 = Bol 373 Open Clusters M31-C107 = vdB0 M31-C205 M31-C202 M31-C203 M31-C410 M31-C285 = M31-A40 M31-C406 = M31-A41 M31-C306 = M31-A42 M31-C312 Association (Star Cloud) N0206 = M31-A78  00 40.6 +40 44 4.2x1.5 Bibliography 
 Astronomy 162: Lecture 27: Spirals Ellipticals Irregulars Readings: Ch 26, section 26-3 Key Ideas Key Ideas: Hubble Classification of Galaxies Differ in terms of Dwarf Galaxies Hubble Classification of Galaxies bright shape Type E: Ellipticals Some images of Ellipticals Type S: Ordinary Spirals Types: Sa, Sb, and Sc Sa Sb Sc Some images of Ordinary Spirals Type SB: Barred Spirals stellar bar Some images of Barred Spirals Type I: Irregulars Some images of Irregular Galaxies Spiral Galaxies Properties: Mass: 10 9 - 10 12 M sun Luminosity: 10 8 - 10 11 L sun Structure Dynamics: Elliptical Galaxies Properties: Mass: 10 5 - 10 13 M sun Luminosity: 10 6 - 10 12 L sun Structure Dynamics: Irregular Galaxies Properties: Mass: 10 6 - 10 11 M sun Luminosity: 10 6 - few x 10 9 L sun Structure Dynamics: Relative Stellar Gas Content Spirals: Ellipticals: Irregulars: Dwarf Irregulars: Forming stars for the first Dwarf Galaxies Possibilities: Cosmic Building Blocks Unit 4 Index Astronomy 162 Main Page Copyright © Richard W. Pogge, All Rights Reserved. 
 Galaxy From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia navigation ,       search This article is about the astronomical structure. For other uses, see Galaxy (disambiguation) . NGC 4414 , a typical spiral galaxy in the constellation Coma Berenices , is about 55,000 light-years in diameter and approximately 60 million light-years away from Earth. A galaxy is a massive, gravitationally bound system consisting of stars , stellar remnants , an interstellar medium of gas and dust , and dark matter , an important but poorly understood component. [ 1 ] [ 2 ] The word galaxy is derived from the Greek galaxias ( γαλαξίας ), literally "milky", a reference to the Milky Way . Examples of galaxies range from dwarfs with as few as ten million (10 7 ) stars [ 3 ] to giants with one hundred trillion (10 14 ) stars, [ 4 ] each orbiting their galaxy's own center of mass . Galaxies contain varying numbers of planets , star systems , star clusters and types of interstellar clouds . In between these objects is a sparse interstellar medium of gas, dust, and cosmic rays . Supermassive black holes reside at the center of most galaxies. They are thought to be the primary driver of active galactic nuclei found at the core of some galaxies. The Milky Way galaxy is known to harbor at least one such object. [ 5 ] Galaxies have been historically categorized according to their apparent shape, usually referred to as their visual morphology. A common form is the elliptical galaxy , [ 6 ] which has an ellipse -shaped light profile. Spiral galaxies are disk-shaped with dusty, curving arms. Those with irregular or unusual shapes are known as irregular galaxies and typically originate from disruption by the gravitational pull of neighboring galaxies. Such interactions between nearby galaxies, which may ultimately result in a merger, sometimes induce significantly increased incidents of star formation leading to starburst galaxies . Smaller galaxies lacking a coherent structure are referred to as irregular galaxies . [ 7 ] There are probably more than 170billion galaxies in the observable universe . [ 8 ] Most are 1,000 to 100,000 parsecs in diameter and usually separated by distances on the order of millions of parsecs (or megaparsecs). Intergalactic space (the space between galaxies) is filled with a tenuous gas of an average density less than one atom per cubic meter. The majority of galaxies are organized into a hierarchy of associations known as galaxy groups and clusters , which, in turn usually form larger superclusters . At the largest scale , these associations are generally arranged into sheets and filaments , which are surrounded by immense voids . [ 9 ] In October 2013, z8 GND 5296 was confirmed to be the most distant galaxy yet discovered whose redshift was measured through the Lyman-alpha emission line of hydrogen , at a distance of approximately 13.1 billion light-years from Earth. The galaxy appears to astronomers as it was "just 700 million years after the Big Bang , when the universe was only about 5 percent of its current age of 13.8 billion years." It produces stars at a phenomenal rate of about 300 suns per year in mass and has a redshift of 7.51. [ 10 ] [ 11 ] Contents 1 Etymology 2 Nomenclature 3 Observation history 3.1 Milky Way 3.2 Distinction from other nebulae 3.3 Modern research 4 Types and morphology 4.1 Ellipticals 4.2 Spirals 4.3 Other morphologies 4.4 Dwarfs 5 Unusual dynamics and activities 5.1 Interacting 5.2 Starburst 5.3 Active nucleus 6 Formation and evolution 6.1 Formation 6.2 Evolution 6.3 Future trends 7 Larger-scale structures 8 Multi-wavelength observation 9 See also 10 Notes 11 References 12 Bibliography 13 External links Etymology [ edit ] The word galaxy derives from the Greek term for our own galaxy, galaxias ( γαλαξίας , "milky one" ), or kyklos ("circle") galaktikos ("milky") [ 12 ] for its appearance as a lighter colored band in the sky. In Greek mythology , Zeus places his son born by a mortal woman, the infant Heracles , on Hera 's breast while she is asleep so that the baby will drink her divine milk and will thus become immortal. Hera wakes up while breastfeeding and then realizes she is nursing an unknown baby: she pushes the baby away and a jet of her milk sprays the night sky, producing the faint band of light known as the Milky Way. [ 13 ] [ 14 ] In the astronomical literature, the capitalized word 'Galaxy' is used to refer to our galaxy, the Milky Way , to distinguish it from the billions of other galaxies. The English term Milky Way can be traced back to a story by Chaucer : "See yonder, lo, the Galaxyë —Geoffrey Chaucer. The House of Fame , c. 1380. [ 12 ] When William Herschel constructed his catalog of deep sky objects in 1786, he used the name spiral nebula for certain objects such as M31 . These would later be recognized as immense conglomerations of stars, when the true distance to these objects began to be appreciated, and they would be termed island universes. However, the word Universe was understood to mean the entirety of existence, so this expression fell into disuse and the objects instead became known as galaxies. [ 15 ] Nomenclature [ edit ] Hubble Frontier Field Abell 2744 . [ 16 ] Tens of thousands of these galaxies have now been catalogued. Only a few have been given a well-established name, such as the Andromeda Galaxy , the Magellanic clouds , the Whirlpool Galaxy and the Sombrero Galaxy . Astronomers work with numbers from certain catalogues, such as the Messier catalogue , the NGC ( New General Catalogue ), the IC ( Index Catalogue ), the CGCG, ( Catalogue of Galaxies and of Clusters of Galaxies ), the MCG ( Morphological Catalogue of Galaxies ) and UGC ( Uppsala General Catalogue of Galaxies ). All of the well-known galaxies appear in one or more of these catalogues but each time under a different number. For example, the Messier 109 , a spiral system which has the number 109 in the catalogue of Messier also codes NCG3992, UGC6937, CGCG 269-023, MCG +09-20-044 and PGC 37617. Because it is customary in science to assign names to most of the studied objects, even to the smallest ones, the Belgian astrophysicist Gerard Bodifee and the classicist Michel Berger started a new catalogue ( CNG-Catalogue of Named Galaxies ) [ 17 ] in which a thousand of well-known galaxies are given meaningful, descriptive names in Latin (or Latinized Greek) [ 18 ] in accordance with the binomial nomenclature that one uses in other sciences such as biology, anatomy, paleontology and in other fields of astronomy such as the geography of Mars. One of the arguments to do so is that these impressive objects deserve better than uninspired codes. For instance Bodifee and Berger propose the informal, descriptive name "Callimorphus Ursae Majoris" for the well-formed barred galaxy Messier 109 in Ursa Major. Observation history [ edit ] The realization that we live in a galaxy, and that there were, in fact, many other galaxies, parallels discoveries that were made about the Milky Way and other nebulae in the night sky. Milky Way [ edit ] Main article: Milky Way Galactic Center of the Milky Way The Greek philosopher Democritus (450–370 BC) proposed that the bright band on the night sky known as the Milky Way might consist of distant stars. [ 19 ] Aristotle (384–322 BC), however, believed the Milky Way to be caused by "the ignition of the fiery exhalation of some stars that were large, numerous and close together" and that the "ignition takes place in the upper part of the atmosphere , in the region of the World that is continuous with the heavenly motions ." [ 20 ] The Neoplatonist philosopher Olympiodorus the Younger (c. 495–570 AD) was scientifically critical of this view, arguing that if the Milky Way were sublunary (situated between the Earth and the Moon) it should appear different at different times and places on the Earth, and that it should have parallax , which it does not. In his view, the Milky Way was celestial. This idea would be influential later in the Islamic world . [ 21 ] According to Mohani Mohamed, the Arabian astronomer Alhazen (965–1037) made the first attempt at observing and measuring the Milky Way's parallax, [ 22 ] and he thus "determined that because the Milky Way had no parallax, it was very remote from the Earth and did not belong to the atmosphere." [ 23 ] The Persian astronomer al-Bīrūnī (973–1048) proposed the Milky Way galaxy to be "a collection of countless fragments of the nature of nebulous stars." [ 24 ] [ 25 ] The Andalusian astronomer Ibn Bajjah ("Avempace", d. 1138) proposed that the Milky Way was made up of many stars that almost touch one another and appear to be a continuous image due to the effect of refraction from sublunary material, [ 20 ] [ 26 ] citing his observation of the conjunction of Jupiter and Mars as evidence of this occurring when two objects are near. [ 20 ] In the 14th century, the Syrian-born Ibn Qayyim proposed the Milky Way galaxy to be "a myriad of tiny stars packed together in the sphere of the fixed stars." [ 27 ] Actual proof of the Milky Way consisting of many stars came in 1610 when the Italian astronomer Galileo Galilei used a telescope to study the Milky Way and discovered that it is composed of a huge number of faint stars. [ 28 ] In 1750 the English astronomer Thomas Wright , in his An original theory or new hypothesis of the Universe , speculated (correctly) that the galaxy might be a rotating body of a huge number of stars held together by gravitational forces , akin to the solar system but on a much larger scale. The resulting disk of stars can be seen as a band on the sky from our perspective inside the disk. [ 29 ] In a treatise in 1755, Immanuel Kant elaborated on Wright's idea about the structure of the Milky Way. The first attempt to describe the shape of the Milky Way and the position of the Sun in it was carried out by William Herschel in 1785 by carefully counting the number of stars in different regions of the sky. He produced a diagram of the shape of the galaxy with the solar system close to the center. [ 30 ] Using a refined approach, Kapteyn in 1920 arrived at the picture of a small (diameter about 15kiloparsecs) ellipsoid galaxy with the Sun close to the center. A different method by Harlow Shapley based on the cataloguing of globular clusters led to a radically different picture: a flat disk with diameter approximately 70kiloparsecs and the Sun far from the center. [ 29 ] Both analyses failed to take into account the absorption of light by interstellar dust present in the galactic plane , but after Robert Julius Trumpler quantified this effect in 1930 by studying open clusters , the present picture of our host galaxy, the Milky Way, emerged. [ 31 ] Distinction from other nebulae [ edit ] Messier 51 by Lord Rosse in 1845, later known as the Whirlpool Galaxy In the 10th century, the Persian astronomer Al-Sufi made the earliest recorded observation of the Andromeda Galaxy , describing it as a "small cloud". [ 32 ] Al-Sufi, who published his findings in his Book of Fixed Stars in 964, also identified the Large Magellanic Cloud , which is visible from Yemen , though not from Isfahan ; it was not seen by Europeans until Magellan 's voyage in the 16th century. [ 33 ] [ 34 ] The Andromeda Galaxy was independently rediscovered by Simon Marius in 1612. [ 32 ] These are the only galaxies outside the Milky Way that are easily visible to the unaided eye, so they were the first galaxies to be observed from Earth. In 1750 Thomas Wright , in his An original theory or new hypothesis of the Universe , speculated (correctly) that the Milky Way was a flattened disk of stars, and that some of the nebulae visible in the night sky might be separate Milky Ways. [ 29 ] [ 35 ] In 1755, Immanuel Kant used the term "island Universe" to describe these distant nebulae. Toward the end of the 18th century, Charles Messier compiled a catalog containing the 109 brightest nebulae (celestial objects with a nebulous appearance), later followed by a larger catalog of 5,000 nebulae assembled by William Herschel. [ 29 ] In 1845, Lord Rosse constructed a new telescope and was able to distinguish between elliptical and spiral nebulae. He also managed to make out individual point sources in some of these nebulae, lending credence to Kant's earlier conjecture. [ 36 ] In 1912, Vesto Slipher made spectrographic studies of the brightest spiral nebulae to determine if they were made from chemicals that would be expected in a planetary system. However, Slipher discovered that the spiral nebulae had high red shifts, indicating that they were moving away at a rate higher than the Milky Way's escape velocity . Thus they were not gravitationally bound to the Milky Way, and were unlikely to be a part of the galaxy. [ 37 ] [ 38 ] In 1917, Heber Curtis had observed a nova S Andromedae within the "Great Andromeda Nebula" (as the Andromeda Galaxy, Messier object M31 , was known). Searching the photographic record, he found 11 more novae . Curtis noticed that these novae were, on average, 10 magnitudes fainter than those that occurred within our galaxy. As a result he was able to come up with a distance estimate of 150,000 parsecs . He became a proponent of the so-called "island universes" hypothesis, which holds that spiral nebulae are actually independent galaxies. [ 39 ] Andromeda Galaxy In 1920 the so-called Great Debate took place between Harlow Shapley and Heber Curtis , concerning the nature of the Milky Way, spiral nebulae, and the dimensions of the Universe. To support his claim that the Great Andromeda Nebula was an external galaxy, Curtis noted the appearance of dark lanes resembling the dust clouds in the Milky Way, as well as the significant Doppler shift . [ 40 ] The matter was conclusively settled in the early 1920s. In 1922, the Estonian astronomer Ernst Öpik gave a distance determination that supported the theory that the Andromeda Nebula is indeed a distant extra-galactic object. [ 41 ] Using the new 100inch Mt. Wilson telescope, Edwin Hubble was able to resolve the outer parts of some spiral nebulae as collections of individual stars and identified some Cepheid variables , thus allowing him to estimate the distance to the nebulae: they were far too distant to be part of the Milky Way. [ 42 ] In 1936 Hubble produced a classification system for galaxies that is used to this day, the Hubble sequence . [ 43 ] Modern research [ edit ] Rotation curve of a typical spiral galaxy: predicted based on the visible matter (A) and observed (B). The distance is from the galactic core. UDFy-38135539 In 1944, Hendrik van de Hulst predicted microwave radiation at a wavelength of 21 cm resulting from interstellar atomic hydrogen gas; [ 44 ] this radiation was observed in 1951. The radiation allowed for much improved study of the Milky Way Galaxy, since it is not affected by dust absorption and its Doppler shift can be used to map the motion of the gas in the Galaxy. These observations led to the postulation of a rotating bar structure in the center of the Galaxy. [ 45 ] With improved radio telescopes , hydrogen gas could also be traced in other galaxies. In the 1970s it was discovered in Vera Rubin 's study of the rotation speed of gas in galaxies that the total visible mass (from the stars and gas) does not properly account for the speed of the rotating gas. This galaxy rotation problem is thought to be explained by the presence of large quantities of unseen dark matter . [ 46 ] [ 47 ] Beginning in the 1990s, the Hubble Space Telescope yielded improved observations. Among other things, it established that the missing dark matter in our galaxy cannot solely consist of inherently faint and small stars. [ 48 ] The Hubble Deep Field , an extremely long exposure of a relatively empty part of the sky, provided evidence that there are about 125 billion ( 1.25 × 10 11 ) galaxies in the Universe. [ 49 ] Improved technology in detecting the spectra invisible to humans (radio telescopes, infrared cameras, and x-ray telescopes ) allow detection of other galaxies that are not detected by Hubble. Particularly, galaxy surveys in the Zone of Avoidance (the region of the sky blocked by the Milky Way) have revealed a number of new galaxies. [ 50 ] Types and morphology [ edit ] Main article: Galaxy morphological classification E indicates a type of elliptical galaxy; an S is a spiral; and SB is a barred-spiral galaxy. [ note 1 ] Galaxies come in three main types: ellipticals, spirals, and irregulars. A slightly more extensive description of galaxy types based on their appearance is given by the Hubble sequence . Since the Hubble sequence is entirely based upon visual morphological type, it may miss certain important characteristics of galaxies such as star formation rate (in starburst galaxies) and activity in the core (in active galaxies ). [ 7 ] Ellipticals [ edit ] Main article: Elliptical galaxy The Hubble classification system rates elliptical galaxies on the basis of their ellipticity, ranging from E0, being nearly spherical, up to E7, which is highly elongated. These galaxies have an ellipsoidal profile, giving them an elliptical appearance regardless of the viewing angle. Their appearance shows little structure and they typically have relatively little interstellar matter . Consequently these galaxies also have a low portion of open clusters and a reduced rate of new star formation. Instead they are dominated by generally older, more evolved stars that are orbiting the common center of gravity in random directions. The stars contain low abundances of heavy elements because star formation ceases after the initial burst. In this sense they have some similarity to the much smaller globular clusters . [ 51 ] The largest galaxies are giant ellipticals. Many elliptical galaxies are believed to form due to the interaction of galaxies , resulting in a collision and merger. They can grow to enormous sizes (compared to spiral galaxies, for example), and giant elliptical galaxies are often found near the core of large galaxy clusters. [ 52 ] Starburst galaxies are the result of such a galactic collision that can result in the formation of an elliptical galaxy. [ 51 ] Spirals [ edit ] Main articles: Spiral galaxy and Barred spiral galaxy Whirlpool Galaxy (on left), an example of an unbarred spiral galaxy. Spiral galaxies, like our own Milky Way galaxy, are galaxies whose visible stars take on a spiraling pinwheel shape. Though the stars and other visible material contained in such a galaxy lie mostly on a plane, the majority of mass in spiral galaxies exists in a roughly spherical halo of dark matter that extends beyond the visible component. [ 53 ] Spiral galaxies consist of a rotating disk of stars and interstellar medium, along with a central bulge of generally older stars. Extending outward from the bulge are relatively bright arms. In the Hubble classification scheme, spiral galaxies are listed as type S , followed by a letter ( a , b , or c ) that indicates the degree of tightness of the spiral arms and the size of the central bulge. An Sa galaxy has tightly wound, poorly defined arms and possesses a relatively large core region. At the other extreme, an Sc galaxy has open, well-defined arms and a small core region. [ 54 ] A galaxy with poorly defined arms is sometimes referred to as a flocculent spiral galaxy ; in contrast to the grand design spiral galaxy that has prominent and well-defined spiral arms. [ 55 ] In spiral galaxies, the spiral arms do have the shape of approximate logarithmic spirals , a pattern that can be theoretically shown to result from a disturbance in a uniformly rotating mass of stars. Like the stars, the spiral arms rotate around the center, but they do so with constant angular velocity . The spiral arms are thought to be areas of high-density matter, or " density waves ". [ 56 ] As stars move through an arm, the space velocity of each stellar system is modified by the gravitational force of the higher density. (The velocity returns to normal after the stars depart on the other side of the arm.) This effect is akin to a "wave" of slowdowns moving along a highway full of moving cars. The arms are visible because the high density facilitates star formation, and therefore they harbor many bright and young stars. [ 57 ] NGC 1300 , an example of a barred spiral galaxy. A majority of spiral galaxies have a linear, bar-shaped band of stars that extends outward to either side of the core, then merges into the spiral arm structure. [ 58 ] In the Hubble classification scheme, these are designated by an SB , followed by a lower-case letter ( a , b or c ) that indicates the form of the spiral arms (in the same manner as the categorization of normal spiral galaxies). Bars are thought to be temporary structures that can occur as a result of a density wave radiating outward from the core, or else due to a tidal interaction with another galaxy. [ 59 ] Many barred spiral galaxies are active, possibly as a result of gas being channeled into the core along the arms. [ 60 ] Our own galaxy, the Milky Way , is a large disk-shaped barred-spiral galaxy [ 61 ] about 30kiloparsecs in diameter and a kiloparsec thick. It contains about two hundred billion (2×10 11 ) [ 62 ] stars and has a total mass of about six hundred billion (6×10 11 ) times the mass of the Sun. [ 63 ] Other morphologies [ edit ] Hoag's Object , an example of a ring galaxy NGC 5866 , an example of a lenticular galaxy Peculiar galaxies are galactic formations that develop unusual properties due to tidal interactions with other galaxies. An example of this is the ring galaxy , which possesses a ring-like structure of stars and interstellar medium surrounding a bare core. A ring galaxy is thought to occur when a smaller galaxy passes through the core of a spiral galaxy. [ 64 ] Such an event may have affected the Andromeda Galaxy , as it displays a multi-ring-like structure when viewed in infrared radiation. [ 65 ] A lenticular galaxy is an intermediate form that has properties of both elliptical and spiral galaxies. These are categorized as Hubble type S0, and they possess ill-defined spiral arms with an elliptical halo of stars. [ 66 ] ( Barred lenticular galaxies receive Hubble classification SB0.) In addition to the classifications mentioned above, there are a number of galaxies that can not be readily classified into an elliptical or spiral morphology. These are categorized as irregular galaxies. An Irr-I galaxy has some structure but does not align cleanly with the Hubble classification scheme. Irr-II galaxies do not possess any structure that resembles a Hubble classification, and may have been disrupted. [ 67 ] Nearby examples of (dwarf) irregular galaxies include the Magellanic Clouds . Dwarfs [ edit ] Main article: Dwarf galaxy Despite the prominence of large elliptical and spiral galaxies, most galaxies in the Universe appear to be dwarf galaxies. These galaxies are relatively small when compared with other galactic formations, being about one hundredth the size of the Milky Way, containing only a few billion stars. Ultra-compact dwarf galaxies have recently been discovered that are only 100parsecs across. [ 68 ] Many dwarf galaxies may orbit a single larger galaxy; the Milky Way has at least a dozen such satellites, with an estimated 300–500 yet to be discovered. [ 69 ] Dwarf galaxies may also be classified as elliptical , spiral , or irregular . Since small dwarf ellipticals bear little resemblance to large ellipticals, they are often called dwarf spheroidal galaxies instead. A study of 27 Milky Way neighbors found that in all dwarf galaxies, the central mass is approximately 10 million solar masses , regardless of whether the galaxy has thousands or millions of stars. This has led to the suggestion that galaxies are largely formed by dark matter , and that the minimum size may indicate a form of warm dark matter incapable of gravitational coalescence on a smaller scale. [ 70 ] Unusual dynamics and activities [ edit ] Interacting [ edit ] Main article: Interacting galaxy Interactions between these galaxies are relatively frequent, and play an important role in their evolution . Near misses between galaxies result in warping distortions due to tidal interactions , and may cause some exchange of gas and dust. [ 71 ] [ 72 ] Antennae Galaxies are undergoing a collision that will result in their eventual merger. Collisions occur when two galaxies pass directly through each other and have sufficient relative momentum not to merge. The stars within these interacting galaxies will typically pass straight through without colliding. However, the gas and dust within the two forms will interact. This can trigger bursts of star formation as the interstellar medium becomes disrupted and compressed. A collision can severely distort the shape of one or both galaxies, forming bars, rings or tail-like structures. [ 71 ] [ 72 ] At the extreme of interactions are galactic mergers. In this case the relative momentum of the two galaxies is insufficient to allow the galaxies to pass through each other. Instead, they gradually merge to form a single, larger galaxy. Mergers can result in significant changes to morphology, as compared to the original galaxies. In the case where one of the galaxies is much more massive, however, the result is known as cannibalism . In this case the larger galaxy will remain relatively undisturbed by the merger, while the smaller galaxy is torn apart. The Milky Way galaxy is currently in the process of cannibalizing the Sagittarius Dwarf Elliptical Galaxy and the Canis Major Dwarf Galaxy . [ 71 ] [ 72 ] Starburst [ edit ] Main article: Starburst galaxy M82 , the archetype starburst galaxy, has experienced a 10-fold increase [ 73 ] in star formation rate as compared to a "normal" galaxy. Stars are created within galaxies from a reserve of cold gas that forms into giant molecular clouds . Some galaxies have been observed to form stars at an exceptional rate, known as a starburst. Should they continue to do so, however, they would consume their reserve of gas in a time frame lower than the lifespan of the galaxy. Hence starburst activity usually lasts for only about ten million years, a relatively brief period in the history of a galaxy. Starburst galaxies were more common during the early history of the Universe, [ 74 ] and, at present, still contribute an estimated 15% to the total star production rate. [ 75 ] Starburst galaxies are characterized by dusty concentrations of gas and the appearance of newly formed stars, including massive stars that ionize the surrounding clouds to create H II regions . [ 76 ] These massive stars produce supernova explosions, resulting in expanding remnants that interact powerfully with the surrounding gas. These outbursts trigger a chain reaction of star building that spreads throughout the gaseous region. Only when the available gas is nearly consumed or dispersed does the starburst activity come to an end. [ 74 ] Starbursts are often associated with merging or interacting galaxies. The prototype example of such a starburst-forming interaction is M82 , which experienced a close encounter with the larger M81 . Irregular galaxies often exhibit spaced knots of starburst activity. [ 77 ] Active nucleus [ edit ] Main article: Active galactic nucleus A portion of the galaxies we can observe are classified as active. That is, a significant portion of the total energy output from the galaxy is emitted by a source other than the stars, dust and interstellar medium . The standard model for an active galactic nucleus is based upon an accretion disc that forms around a supermassive black hole (SMBH) at the core region. The radiation from an active galactic nucleus results from the gravitational energy of matter as it falls toward the black hole from the disc. [ 78 ] In about 10% of these objects, a diametrically opposed pair of energetic jets ejects particles from the core at velocities close to the speed of light . The mechanism for producing these jets is still not well understood. [ 79 ] M87 . Active galaxies that emit high-energy radiation in the form of x-rays are classified as Seyfert galaxies or quasars , depending on the luminosity. Blazars are believed to be an active galaxy with a relativistic jet that is pointed in the direction of the Earth. A radio galaxy emits radio frequencies from relativistic jets. A unified model of these types of active galaxies explains their differences based on the viewing angle of the observer. [ 79 ] Possibly related to active galactic nuclei (as well as starburst regions) are low-ionization nuclear emission-line regions (LINERs). The emission from LINER-type galaxies is dominated by weakly ionized elements. [ 80 ] Approximately one-third of nearby galaxies are classified as containing LINER nuclei. [ 78 ] [ 80 ] [ 81 ] Formation and evolution [ edit ] Main article: Galaxy formation and evolution The study of galactic formation and evolution attempts to answer questions regarding how galaxies formed and their evolutionary path over the history of the Universe. Some theories in this field have now become widely accepted, but it is still an active area in astrophysics . Formation [ edit ] ESO /L. Calçada Current cosmological models of the early Universe are based on the Big Bang theory. About 300,000 years after this event, atoms of hydrogen and helium began to form, in an event called recombination . Nearly all the hydrogen was neutral (non-ionized) and readily absorbed light, and no stars had yet formed. As a result this period has been called the " Dark Ages ". It was from density fluctuations (or anisotropic irregularities) in this primordial matter that larger structures began to appear. As a result, masses of baryonic matter started to condense within cold dark matter halos. [ 82 ] [ 83 ] These primordial structures would eventually become the galaxies we see today. Evidence for the early appearance of galaxies was found in 2006, when it was discovered that the galaxy IOK-1 has an unusually high redshift of 6.96, corresponding to just 750 million years after the Big Bang and making it the most distant and primordial galaxy yet seen. [ 84 ] While some scientists have claimed other objects (such as Abell 1835 IR1916 ) have higher redshifts (and therefore are seen in an earlier stage of the Universe's evolution), IOK-1's age and composition have been more reliably established. However, in December 2012, astronomers reported that the UDFj-39546284 galaxy is the most distant galaxy known and has a redshift value of 11.9. The galaxy, estimated to have existed around "380 million years" [ 85 ] after the Big Bang (which was about 13.8 billion years ago), [ 86 ] is about 13.42 billion light years away. The existence of such early protogalaxies suggests that they must have grown in the so-called "Dark Ages". [ 82 ] The detailed process by which such early galaxy formation occurred is a major open question in astronomy. Theories could be divided into two categories: top-down and bottom-up. In top-down theories (such as the Eggen–Lynden-Bell–Sandage [ELS] model), protogalaxies form in a large-scale simultaneous collapse lasting about one hundred million years. [ 87 ] In bottom-up theories (such as the Searle-Zinn [SZ] model), small structures such as globular clusters form first, and then a number of such bodies accrete to form a larger galaxy. [ 88 ] Once protogalaxies began to form and contract, the first halo stars (called Population III stars ) appeared within them. These were composed almost entirely of hydrogen and helium, and may have been massive. If so, these huge stars would have quickly consumed their supply of fuel and became supernovae , releasing heavy elements into the interstellar medium . [ 89 ] This first generation of stars re-ionized the surrounding neutral hydrogen, creating expanding bubbles of space through which light could readily travel. [ 90 ] Evolution [ edit ] Within a billion years of a galaxy's formation, key structures begin to appear. Globular clusters , the central supermassive black hole, and a galactic bulge of metal-poor Population II stars form. The creation of a supermassive black hole appears to play a key role in actively regulating the growth of galaxies by limiting the total amount of additional matter added. [ 91 ] During this early epoch, galaxies undergo a major burst of star formation. [ 92 ] During the following two billion years, the accumulated matter settles into a galactic disc . [ 93 ] A galaxy will continue to absorb infalling material from high-velocity clouds and dwarf galaxies throughout its life. [ 94 ] This matter is mostly hydrogen and helium. The cycle of stellar birth and death slowly increases the abundance of heavy elements, eventually allowing the formation of planets . [ 95 ] Hubble eXtreme Deep Field (XDF) XDF size compared to the size of the moon – several thousand galaxies, each consisting of billions of stars , are in this small view. XDF (2012) view– each light speck is a galaxy– some of these are as old as 13.2 billion years [ 96 ] – the observable universe is estimated to contain 200 billion galaxies. XDF image shows fully mature galaxies in the foreground plane– nearly mature galaxies from 5 to 9 billion years ago– protogalaxies , blazing with young stars , beyond 9 billion years. The evolution of galaxies can be significantly affected by interactions and collisions. Mergers of galaxies were common during the early epoch, and the majority of galaxies were peculiar in morphology. [ 97 ] Given the distances between the stars, the great majority of stellar systems in colliding galaxies will be unaffected. However, gravitational stripping of the interstellar gas and dust that makes up the spiral arms produces a long train of stars known as tidal tails. Examples of these formations can be seen in NGC 4676 [ 98 ] or the Antennae Galaxies . [ 99 ] As an example of such an interaction, the Milky Way galaxy and the nearby Andromeda Galaxy are moving toward each other at about 130 km/s , and—depending upon the lateral movements—the two may collide in about five to six billion years. Although the Milky Way has never collided with a galaxy as large as Andromeda before, evidence of past collisions of the Milky Way with smaller dwarf galaxies is increasing. [ 100 ] Such large-scale interactions are rare. As time passes, mergers of two systems of equal size become less common. Most bright galaxies have remained fundamentally unchanged for the last few billion years, and the net rate of star formation probably also peaked approximately ten billion years ago. [ 101 ] Future trends [ edit ] At present, most star formation occurs in smaller galaxies where cool gas is not so depleted. [ 97 ] Spiral galaxies, like the Milky Way, only produce new generations of stars as long as they have dense molecular clouds of interstellar hydrogen in their spiral arms. [ 102 ] Elliptical galaxies are already largely devoid of this gas, and so form no new stars. [ 103 ] The supply of star-forming material is finite; once stars have converted the available supply of hydrogen into heavier elements, new star formation will come to an end. [ 104 ] The current era of star formation is expected to continue for up to one hundred billion years, and then the "stellar age" will wind down after about ten trillion to one hundred trillion years (10 13 –10 14 years), as the smallest, longest-lived stars in our astrosphere, tiny red dwarfs , begin to fade. At the end of the stellar age, galaxies will be composed of compact objects : brown dwarfs , white dwarfs that are cooling or cold (" black dwarfs "), neutron stars , and black holes . Eventually, as a result of gravitational relaxation , all stars will either fall into central supermassive black holes or be flung into intergalactic space as a result of collisions. [ 104 ] [ 105 ] Larger-scale structures [ edit ] Main articles: Observable universe#Large-scale structure , Galaxy filament , and Galaxy groups and clusters Deep sky surveys show that galaxies are often found in relatively close association with other galaxies. Solitary galaxies that have not significantly interacted with another galaxy of comparable mass during the past billion years are relatively scarce. Only about 5% of the galaxies surveyed have been found to be truly isolated; however, these isolated formations may have interacted and even merged with other galaxies in the past, and may still be orbited by smaller, satellite galaxies. Isolated galaxies [ note 2 ] can produce stars at a higher rate than normal, as their gas is not being stripped by other nearby galaxies. [ 106 ] Seyfert's Sextet is an example of a compact galaxy group. Millennium Simulation showing large-scale structure of the Cosmos. The image spans about 400 million light years across. On the largest scale, the Universe is continually expanding, resulting in an average increase in the separation between individual galaxies (see Hubble's law ). Associations of galaxies can overcome this expansion on a local scale through their mutual gravitational attraction. These associations formed early in the Universe, as clumps of dark matter pulled their respective galaxies together. Nearby groups later merged to form larger-scale clusters. This on-going merger process (as well as an influx of infalling gas) heats the inter-galactic gas within a cluster to very high temperatures, reaching 30–100 megakelvins . [ 107 ] About 70–80% of the mass in a cluster is in the form of dark matter, with 10–30% consisting of this heated gas and the remaining few percent of the matter in the form of galaxies. [ 108 ] Most galaxies in the Universe are gravitationally bound to a number of other galaxies. These form a fractal -like hierarchy of clustered structures, with the smallest such associations being termed groups. A group of galaxies is the most common type of galactic cluster, and these formations contain a majority of the galaxies (as well as most of the baryonic mass) in the Universe. [ 109 ] [ 110 ] To remain gravitationally bound to such a group, each member galaxy must have a sufficiently low velocity to prevent it from escaping (see Virial theorem ). If there is insufficient kinetic energy , however, the group may evolve into a smaller number of galaxies through mergers. [ 111 ] Larger structures containing many thousands of galaxies packed into an area a few megaparsecs across are called clusters. Clusters of galaxies are often dominated by a single giant elliptical galaxy, known as the brightest cluster galaxy , which, over time, tidally destroys its satellite galaxies and adds their mass to its own. [ 112 ] Superclusters contain tens of thousands of galaxies, which are found in clusters, groups and sometimes individually. At the supercluster scale , galaxies are arranged into sheets and filaments surrounding vast empty voids. [ 113 ] Above this scale, the Universe appears to be the same in all directions ( isotropic and homogeneous ). [ 114 ] The Milky Way galaxy is a member of an association named the Local Group , a relatively small group of galaxies that has a diameter of approximately onemegaparsec. The Milky Way and the Andromeda Galaxy are the two brightest galaxies within the group; many of the other member galaxies are dwarf companions of these two galaxies. [ 115 ] The Local Group itself is a part of a cloud-like structure within the Virgo Supercluster , a large, extended structure of groups and clusters of galaxies centered on the Virgo Cluster . [ 116 ] Multi-wavelength observation [ edit ] See also: Observational astronomy This ultraviolet image of Andromeda shows blue regions containing young, massive stars. After galaxies external to the Milky Way were found to exist, initial observations were made mostly using visible light . The peak radiation of most stars lies here, so the observation of the stars that form galaxies has been a major component of optical astronomy . It is also a favorable portion of the spectrum for observing ionized H II regions , and for examining the distribution of dusty arms. The dust present in the interstellar medium is opaque to visual light. It is more transparent to far-infrared , which can be used to observe the interior regions of giant molecular clouds and galactic cores in great detail. [ 117 ] Infrared is also used to observe distant, red-shifted galaxies that were formed much earlier in the history of the Universe. Water vapor and carbon dioxide absorb a number of useful portions of the infrared spectrum, so high-altitude or space-based telescopes are used for infrared astronomy . The first non-visual study of galaxies, particularly active galaxies, was made using radio frequencies . The atmosphere is nearly transparent to radio between 5 MHz and 30GHz. (The ionosphere blocks signals below this range.) [ 118 ] Large radio interferometers have been used to map the active jets emitted from active nuclei. Radio telescopes can also be used to observe neutral hydrogen ( via 21cm radiation ), including, potentially, the non-ionized matter in the early Universe that later collapsed to form galaxies. [ 119 ] Ultraviolet and X-ray telescopes can observe highly energetic galactic phenomena. An ultraviolet flare was observed when a star in a distant galaxy was torn apart from the tidal forces of a black hole. [ 120 ] The distribution of hot gas in galactic clusters can be mapped by X-rays. The existence of super-massive black holes at the cores of galaxies was confirmed through X-ray astronomy. [ 121 ] See also [ edit ] Book: Galaxies Dark galaxy Galactic orientation Galaxy formation and evolution List of galaxies Astronomy portal Space portal Star portal List of nearest galaxies Luminous infrared galaxy Supermassive black hole Timeline of knowledge about galaxies, clusters of galaxies, and large-scale structure Notes [ edit ] ^ Galaxies to the left side of the Hubble classification scheme are sometimes referred to as "early-type", while those to the right are "late-type". ^ The term "field galaxy" is sometimes used to mean an isolated galaxy, although the same term is also used to describe galaxies that do not belong to a cluster but may be a member of a group of galaxies. References [ edit ] ^ Sparke Gallagher III 2000 , p.i ^ Hupp, E.; Roy, S.; Watzke, M. (2006-08-12). "NASA Finds Direct Proof of Dark Matter" . NASA . Retrieved 2007-04-17 . ^ "Unveiling the Secret of a Virgo Dwarf Galaxy" . ESO . 2000-05-03 . Retrieved 2007-01-03 . ^ Uson, J. M.; Boughn, S. P.; Kuhn, J. R. (1990). "The central galaxy in Abell 2029– An old supergiant". Science 250 (4980): 539–540. Bibcode : 1990Sci...250..539U . doi : 10.1126/science.250.4980.539 . ^ Finley, D.; Aguilar, D. (2005-11-02). "Astronomers Get Closest Look Yet At Milky Way's Mysterious Core" . National Radio Astronomy Observatory . Retrieved 2006-08-10 . ^ Hoover, A. (2003-06-16). "UF Astronomers: Universe Slightly Simpler Than Expected" . Hubble News Desk . Retrieved 2011-03-04 . Based upon: Graham, A. W.; Guzman, R. (2003). "HST Photometry of Dwarf Elliptical Galaxies in Coma, and an Explanation for the Alleged Structural Dichotomy between Dwarf and Bright Elliptical Galaxies". Astronomical Journal 125 (6): 2936–2950. arXiv : astro-ph/0303391 . Bibcode : 2003AJ....125.2936G . doi : 10.1086/374992 . ^ a b Jarrett, T. H. "Near-Infrared Galaxy Morphology Atlas" . California Institute of Technology . Retrieved 2007-01-09 . ^ Deutsch, David (2011). The Fabric of Reality . Penguin Books Limited. pp.234–. ISBN 978-0-14-196961-9 . ^ "Galaxy Clusters and Large-Scale Structure" . University of Cambridge . Retrieved 2007-01-15 . ^ Finkelstein, S. L.; C. Papovich, M. Dickinson, M. Song, V. Tilvi, A. M. Koekemoer, K. D. Finkelstein, B. Mobasher, H. C. Ferguson, M. Giavalisco, N. Reddy, M. L. N. Ashby, A. Dekel, G. G. Fazio, A. Fontana, N. A. Grogin, J.-S. Huang, D. Kocevski, M. Rafelski, B. J. Weiner, S. P. Willner (October 24, 2013). "A galaxy rapidly forming stars 700 million years after the Big Bang at redshift 7.51". Nature . 7472 502 (7472): 524. doi : 10.1038/nature12657 . Cite uses deprecated parameters ( help ) ^ University of California - Riverside (October 23, 2013). "Astronomers discover the most distant known galaxy: Galaxy seen as it was just 700 million years after Big Bang" . ScienceDaily . Retrieved October 24, 2013 . ^ a b Harper, D. "galaxy" . Online Etymology Dictionary . Retrieved 2011-11-11 . ^ Waller Hodge 2003 , p.91 ^ Koneãn˘, Lubomír. "Emblematics, Agriculture, and Mythography in The Origin of the Milky Way" . Academy of Sciences of the Czech Republic . Archived from the original on July 20, 2006 . Retrieved 2007-01-05 . ^ Rao, J. (2005-09-02). "Explore the Archer's Realm" . Space.com . Retrieved 2007-01-03 . ^ "Distant galaxy in Hubble Frontier Field Abell 2744" . ESA/Hubble . Retrieved 11 February 2014 . ^ Bodifée G. Berger M. (2010). "CNG-Catalogue of Named Galaxies" . Retrieved 2014-01-17 . ^ "Contemporary Latin" . Retrieved 22 January 2014 . ^ Plutarch (2006). The Complete Works Volume 3: Essays and Miscellanies . Chapter 3: Echo Library. p.66. ISBN 978-1-4068-3224-2 . ^ a b c Montada, J. P. (2007-09-28). "Ibn Bajja" . Stanford Encyclopedia of Philosophy . Retrieved 2008-07-11 . ^ Heidarzadeh 2008 , pp.23–25 ^ Mohamed 2000 , pp.49–50 ^ Bouali, H.-E.; Zghal, M.; Lakhdar, Z. B. (2005). "Popularisation of Optical Phenomena: Establishing the First Ibn Al-Haytham Workshop on Photography" . The Education and Training in Optics and Photonics Conference . Retrieved 2008-07-08 . ^ O'Connor, John J. ; Robertson, Edmund F. , "Abu Rayhan Muhammad ibn Ahmad al-Biruni" , MacTutor History of Mathematics archive , University of St Andrews . ^ Al-Biruni 2004 , p.87 ^ Heidarzadeh 2008 , p.25, Table 2.1 ^ Livingston, J. W. (1971). "Ibn Qayyim al-Jawziyyah: A Fourteenth Century Defense against Astrological Divination and Alchemical Transmutation". Journal of the American Oriental Society 91 (1): 96–103 [99]. doi : 10.2307/600445 . JSTOR 600445 . ^ O'Connor, J. J.; Robertson, E. F. (November 2002). "Galileo Galilei" . University of St. Andrews . Retrieved 2007-01-08 . ^ a b c d Evans, J. C. (1998-11-24). "Our Galaxy" . George Mason University . Retrieved 2007-01-04 . ^ Paul 1993 , pp.16–18 ^ Trimble, V. (1999). "Robert Trumpler and the (Non)transparency of Space". Bulletin of the American Astronomical Society 31 (31): 1479. Bibcode : 1999AAS...195.7409T . ^ a b Kepple Sanner 1998 , p.18 ^ "Abd-al-Rahman Al Sufi (December 7, 903– May 25, 986 A.D.)" . Observatoire de Paris . Retrieved 2007-04-19 . ^ "The Large Magellanic Cloud, LMC" . Observatoire de Paris . Retrieved 2007-04-19 . ^ See text quoted from Wright's An original theory or new hypothesis of the Universe in Dyson, F. (1979). Disturbing the Universe . Pan Books . p.245. ISBN 0-330-26324-2 . ^ Abbey, L. "The Earl of Rosse and the Leviathan of Parsontown" . Retrieved 2007-01-04 . ^ Slipher, V. M. (1913). "The radial velocity of the Andromeda Nebula". Lowell Observatory Bulletin 1 : 56–57. Bibcode : 1913LowOB...2...56S . ^ Slipher, V. M. (1915). "Spectrographic Observations of Nebulae". Popular Astronomy 23 : 21–24. Bibcode : 1915PA.....23...21S . ^ Curtis, H. D. (1988). "Novae in Spiral Nebulae and the Island Universe Theory". Publications of the Astronomical Society of the Pacific 100 : 6. Bibcode : 1988PASP..100....6C . doi : 10.1086/132128 . ^ Weaver, H. F. "Robert Julius Trumpler" . US National Academy of Sciences . Retrieved 2007-01-05 . ^ Öpik, E. (1922). "An estimate of the distance of the Andromeda Nebula". Astrophysical Journal 55 : 406. Bibcode : 1922ApJ....55..406O . doi : 10.1086/142680 . ^ Hubble, E. P. (1929). "A spiral nebula as a stellar system, Messier 31". Astrophysical Journal 69 : 103–158. Bibcode : 1929ApJ....69..103H . doi : 10.1086/143167 . ^ Sandage, A. (1989). "Edwin Hubble, 1889–1953" . Journal of the Royal Astronomical Society of Canada 83 (6): 351–362. Bibcode : 1989JRASC..83..351S . Retrieved 2007-01-08 . ^ Tenn, J. "Hendrik Christoffel van de Hulst" . Sonoma State University . Retrieved 2007-01-05 . ^ López-Corredoira, M.; et al. (2001). "Searching for the in-plane Galactic bar and ring in DENIS". Astronomy and Astrophysics 373 (1): 139–152. arXiv : astro-ph/0104307 . Bibcode : 2001AA...373..139L . doi : 10.1051/0004-6361:20010560 . Cite uses deprecated parameters ( help ) ^ Rubin, V. C. (1983). "Dark matter in spiral galaxies". Scientific American 248 (6): 96–106. Bibcode : 1983SciAm.248...96R . doi : 10.1038/scientificamerican0683-96 . ^ Rubin, V. C. (2000). "One Hundred Years of Rotating Galaxies". Publications of the Astronomical Society of the Pacific 112 (772): 747–750. Bibcode : 2000PASP..112..747R . doi : 10.1086/316573 . ^ "Hubble Rules Out a Leading Explanation for Dark Matter" . Hubble News Desk. 1994-10-17 . Retrieved 2007-01-08 . ^ "How many galaxies are there?" . NASA . 2002-11-27 . Retrieved 2007-01-08 . ^ Kraan-Korteweg, R. C.; Juraszek, S. (2000). "Mapping the hidden Universe: The galaxy distribution in the Zone of Avoidance". Publications of the Astronomical Society of Australia 17 (1): 6–12. arXiv : astro-ph/9910572 . Bibcode : 1999astro.ph.10572K . doi : 10.1071/AS00006 . ^ a b Barstow, M. A. (2005). "Elliptical Galaxies" . Leicester University Physics Department . Retrieved 2006-06-08 . ^ "Galaxies" . Cornell University . 2005-10-20 . Retrieved 2006-08-10 . ^ Williams, M. J.; Bureau, M.; Cappellari, M. (2009). "Kinematic constraints on the stellar and dark matter content of spiral and S0 galaxies". Monthly Notices of the Royal Astronomical Society 400 (4): 1665. doi : 10.1111/j.1365-2966.2009.15582.x . edit ^ Smith, G. (2000-03-06). "Galaxies— The Spiral Nebulae" . University of California , San Diego Center for Astrophysics Space Sciences . Retrieved 2006-11-30 . ^ Van den Bergh 1998 , p.17 ^ Bertin Lin 1996 , pp.65–85 ^ Belkora 2003 , p.355 ^ Eskridge, P. B.; Frogel, J. A. (1999). "What is the True Fraction of Barred Spiral Galaxies?". Astrophysics and Space Science . 269/270: 427–430. Bibcode : 1999ApSS.269..427E . doi : 10.1023/A:1017025820201 . ^ Bournaud, F.; Combes, F. (2002). "Gas accretion on spiral galaxies: Bar formation and renewal". Astronomy and Astrophysics 392 (1): 83–102. arXiv : astro-ph/0206273 . Bibcode : 2002AA...392...83B . doi : 10.1051/0004-6361:20020920 . ^ Knapen, J. H.; Perez-Ramirez, D.; Laine, S. (2002). "Circumnuclear regions in barred spiral galaxies— II. Relations to host galaxies". Monthly Notices of the Royal Astronomical Society 337 (3): 808–828. arXiv : astro-ph/0207258 . Bibcode : 2002MNRAS.337..808K . doi : 10.1046/j.1365-8711.2002.05840.x . ^ Alard, C. (2001). "Another bar in the Bulge". Astronomy and Astrophysics Letters 379 (2): L44–L47. arXiv : astro-ph/0110491 . Bibcode : 2001AA...379L..44A . doi : 10.1051/0004-6361:20011487 . ^ Sanders, R. (2006-01-09). "Milky Way galaxy is warped and vibrating like a drum" . UCBerkeley News . Retrieved 2006-05-24 . ^ Bell, G. R.; Levine, S. E. (1997). "Mass of the Milky Way and Dwarf Spheroidal Stream Membership". Bulletin of the American Astronomical Society 29 (2): 1384. Bibcode : 1997AAS...19110806B . ^ Gerber, R. A.; Lamb, S. A.; Balsara, D. S. (1994). "Ring Galaxy Evolution as a Function of "Intruder" Mass". Bulletin of the American Astronomical Society 26 : 911. Bibcode : 1994AAS...184.3204G . ^ "ISO unveils the hidden rings of Andromeda" (Press release). European Space Agency . 1998-10-14 . Retrieved 2006-05-24 . ^ "Spitzer Reveals What Edwin Hubble Missed" . Harvard-Smithsonian Center for Astrophysics . 2004-05-31 . Retrieved 2006-12-06 . ^ Barstow, M. A. (2005). "Irregular Galaxies" . University of Leicester . Retrieved 2006-12-05 . ^ Phillipps, S.; Drinkwater, M. J.; Gregg, M. D.; Jones, J. B. (2001). "Ultracompact Dwarf Galaxies in the Fornax Cluster". Astrophysical Journal 560 (1): 201–206. arXiv : astro-ph/0106377 . Bibcode : 2001ApJ...560..201P . doi : 10.1086/322517 . ^ Groshong, K. (2006-04-24). "Strange satellite galaxies revealed around Milky Way" . New Scientist . Retrieved 2007-01-10 . ^ Schirber, M. (2008-08-27). "No Slimming Down for Dwarf Galaxies" . ScienceNOW . Retrieved 2008-08-27 . ^ a b c "Galaxy Interactions" . University of Maryland Department of Astronomy. Archived from the original on May 9, 2006 . Retrieved 2006-12-19 . ^ a b c "Interacting Galaxies" . Swinburne University . Retrieved 2006-12-19 . ^ "Happy Sweet Sixteen, Hubble Telescope!" . NASA . 2006-04-24 . Retrieved 2006-08-10 . ^ a b "Starburst Galaxies" . Harvard-Smithsonian Center for Astrophysics . 2006-08-29 . Retrieved 2006-08-10 . ^ Kennicutt Jr., R. C.; et al. (2005). "Demographics and Host Galaxies of Starbursts". Starbursts: From 30 Doradus to Lyman Break Galaxies . Springer . p.187. Bibcode : 2005sdlb.proc..187K . Cite uses deprecated parameters ( help ) ^ Smith, G. (2006-07-13). "Starbursts Colliding Galaxies" . University of California , San Diego Center for Astrophysics Space Sciences . Retrieved 2006-08-10 . ^ Keel, B. (September 2006). "Starburst Galaxies" . University of Alabama . Retrieved 2006-12-11 . ^ a b Keel, W. C. (2000). "Introducing Active Galactic Nuclei" . University of Alabama . Retrieved 2006-12-06 . ^ a b Lochner, J.; Gibb, M. "A Monster in the Middle" . NASA . Retrieved 2006-12-20 . ^ a b Heckman, T. M. (1980). "An optical and radio survey of the nuclei of bright galaxies— Activity in normal galactic nuclei". Astronomy and Astrophysics 87 : 152–164. Bibcode : 1980AA....87..152H . ^ Ho, L. C.; Filippenko, A. V.; Sargent, W. L. W. (1997). "A Search for "Dwarf" Seyfert Nuclei. V. Demographics of Nuclear Activity in Nearby Galaxies". Astrophysical Journal 487 (2): 568–578. arXiv : astro-ph/9704108 . Bibcode : 1997ApJ...487..568H . doi : 10.1086/304638 . ^ a b "Search for Submillimeter Protogalaxies" . Harvard-Smithsonian Center for Astrophysics . 1999-11-18 . Retrieved 2007-01-10 . ^ Firmani, C.; Avila-Reese, V. (2003). "Physical processes behind the morphological Hubble sequence". Revista Mexicana de Astronomía y Astrofísica 17 : 107–120. arXiv : astro-ph/0303543 . Bibcode : 2003RMxAC..17..107F . ^ McMahon, R. (2006). "Journey to the birth of the Universe". Nature 443 (7108): 151–2. Bibcode : 2006Natur.443..151M . doi : 10.1038/443151a . PMID 16971933 . ^ Wall, Mike (December 12, 2012). "Ancient Galaxy May Be Most Distant Ever Seen" . Space.com . Retrieved December 12, 2012 . ^ "Cosmic Detectives" . The European Space Agency (ESA). 2013-04-02 . Retrieved 2013-04-15 . ^ Eggen, O. J.; Lynden-Bell, D.; Sandage, A. R. (1962). "Evidence from the motions of old stars that the Galaxy collapsed". Reports on Progress in Physics 136 : 748. Bibcode : 1962ApJ...136..748E . doi : 10.1086/147433 . ^ Searle, L.; Zinn, R. (1978). "Compositions of halo clusters and the formation of the galactic halo". Astrophysical Journal 225 (1): 357–379. Bibcode : 1978ApJ...225..357S . doi : 10.1086/156499 . ^ Heger, A.; Woosley, S. E. (2002). "The Nucleosynthetic Signature of Population III". Astrophysical Journal 567 (1): 532–543. arXiv : astro-ph/0107037 . Bibcode : 2002ApJ...567..532H . doi : 10.1086/338487 . ^ Barkana, R.; Loeb, A. (1999). "In the beginning: the first sources of light and the reionization of the Universe". Physics Reports 349 (2): 125–238. arXiv : astro-ph/0010468 . Bibcode : 2001PhR...349..125B . doi : 10.1016/S0370-1573(01)00019-9 . ^ "Simulations Show How Growing Black Holes Regulate Galaxy Formation" . Carnegie Mellon University . 2005-02-09 . Retrieved 2007-01-07 . ^ Massey, R. (2007-04-21). "Caught in the act; forming galaxies captured in the young Universe" . Royal Astronomical Society . Retrieved 2007-04-20 . ^ Noguchi, M. (1999). "Early Evolution of Disk Galaxies: Formation of Bulges in Clumpy Young Galactic Disks". Astrophysical Journal 514 (1): 77–95. arXiv : astro-ph/9806355 . Bibcode : 1999ApJ...514...77N . doi : 10.1086/306932 . ^ Baugh, C.; Frenk, C. (May 1999). "How are galaxies made?" . PhysicsWeb . Retrieved 2007-01-16 . ^ Gonzalez, G. (1998). "The Stellar Metallicity— Planet Connection". Proceedings of a workshop on brown dwarfs and extrasolar planets . p.431. Bibcode : 1998bdep.conf..431G . ^ Moskowitz, Clara (September 25, 2012). "Hubble Telescope Reveals Farthest View Into Universe Ever" . Space.com . Retrieved September 26, 2012 . ^ a b Conselice, C. J. (February 2007). "The Universe's Invisible Hand". Scientific American 296 (2): 35–41. doi : 10.1038/scientificamerican0207-34 . ^ Ford, H.; et al. (2002-04-30). "Hubble's New Camera Delivers Breathtaking Views of the Universe" . Hubble News Desk . Retrieved 2007-05-08 . Cite uses deprecated parameters ( help ) ^ Struck, C. (1999). "Galaxy Collisions". Physics Reports 321 : 1. arXiv : astro-ph/9908269 . Bibcode : 1999PhR...321....1S . doi : 10.1016/S0370-1573(99)00030-7 . ^ Wong, J. (2000-04-14). "Astrophysicist maps out our own galaxy's end" . University of Toronto . Archived from the original on January 8, 2007 . Retrieved 2007-01-11 . ^ Panter, B.; Jimenez, R.; Heavens, A. F.; Charlot, S. (2007). "The star formation histories of galaxies in the Sloan Digital Sky Survey". Monthly Notices of the Royal Astronomical Society 378 (4): 1550–1564. arXiv : astro-ph/0608531 . Bibcode : 2007MNRAS.378.1550P . doi : 10.1111/j.1365-2966.2007.11909.x . ^ Kennicutt Jr., R. C.; Tamblyn, P.; Congdon, C. E. (1994). "Past and future star formation in disk galaxies". Astrophysical Journal 435 (1): 22–36. Bibcode : 1994ApJ...435...22K . doi : 10.1086/174790 . ^ Knapp, G. R. (1999). Star Formation in Early Type Galaxies . Astronomical Society of the Pacific . Bibcode : 1998astro.ph..8266K . ISBN 1-886733-84-8 . OCLC 41302839 . ^ a b Adams, Fred; Laughlin, Greg (2006-07-13). "The Great Cosmic Battle" . Astronomical Society of the Pacific . Retrieved 2007-01-16 . ^ Pobojewski, S. (1997-01-21). "Physics offers glimpse into the dark side of the Universe" . University of Michigan . Retrieved 2007-01-13 . ^ McKee, M. (2005-06-07). "Galactic loners produce more stars" . New Scientist . Retrieved 2007-01-15 . ^ "Groups Clusters of Galaxies" . NASA / Chandra . Retrieved 2007-01-15 . ^ Ricker, P. "When Galaxy Clusters Collide" . San Diego Supercomputer Center . Retrieved 2008-08-27 . ^ Dahlem, M. (2006-11-24). "Optical and radio survey of Southern Compact Groups of galaxies" . University of Birmingham Astrophysics and Space Research Group. Archived from the original on June 13, 2007 . Retrieved 2007-01-15 . ^ Ponman, T. (2005-02-25). "Galaxy Systems: Groups" . University of Birmingham Astrophysics and Space Research Group . Retrieved 2007-01-15 . ^ Girardi, M.; Giuricin, G. (2000). "The Observational Mass Function of Loose Galaxy Groups". The Astrophysical Journal 540 (1): 45–56. arXiv : astro-ph/0004149 . Bibcode : 2000ApJ...540...45G . doi : 10.1086/309314 . ^ Dubinski, J. (1998). "The Origin of the Brightest Cluster Galaxies" . Astrophysical Journal 502 (2): 141–149. arXiv : astro-ph/9709102 . Bibcode : 1998ApJ...502..141D . doi : 10.1086/305901 . ^ Bahcall, N. A. (1988). "Large-scale structure in the Universe indicated by galaxy clusters". Annual Review of Astronomy and Astrophysics 26 (1): 631–686. Bibcode : 1988ARAA..26..631B . doi : 10.1146/annurev.aa.26.090188.003215 . ^ Mandolesi, N.; et al. (1986). "Large-scale homogeneity of the Universe measured by the microwave background". Letters to Nature 319 (6056): 751–753. Bibcode : 1986Natur.319..751M . doi : 10.1038/319751a0 . Cite uses deprecated parameters ( help ) ^ van den Bergh, S. (2000). "Updated Information on the Local Group". Publications of the Astronomical Society of the Pacific 112 (770): 529–536. arXiv : astro-ph/0001040 . Bibcode : 2000PASP..112..529V . doi : 10.1086/316548 . ^ Tully, R. B. (1982). "The Local Supercluster". Astrophysical Journal 257 : 389–422. Bibcode : 1982ApJ...257..389T . doi : 10.1086/159999 . ^ "Near, Mid Far Infrared" . IPAC / NASA . Retrieved 2007-01-02 . ^ "The Effects of Earth's Upper Atmosphere on Radio Signals" . NASA . Retrieved 2006-08-10 . ^ "Giant Radio Telescope Imaging Could Make Dark Matter Visible" . ScienceDaily . 2006-12-14 . Retrieved 2007-01-02 . ^ "NASA Telescope Sees Black Hole Munch on a Star" . NASA . 2006-12-05 . Retrieved 2007-01-02 . ^ Dunn, R. "An Introduction to X-ray Astronomy" . Institute of Astronomy X-Ray Group . Retrieved 2007-01-02 . Bibliography [ edit ] Al-Biruni (2004). The Book of Instruction in the Elements of the Art of Astrology . R. Ramsay Wright (transl.). Kessinger Publishing . ISBN 0-7661-9307-1 . Belkora, L. (2003). Minding the Heavens: the Story of our Discovery of the Milky Way . CRC Press . ISBN 0-7503-0730-7 . Bertin, G.; Lin, C.-C. (1996). Spiral Structure in Galaxies: a Density Wave Theory . MIT Press . ISBN 0-262-02396-2 . Binney, J.; Merrifield, M. (1998). Galactic Astronomy . Princeton University Press . ISBN 0-691-00402-1 . OCLC 39108765 . Dickinson, T. (2004). The Universe and Beyond (4th ed.). Firefly Books . ISBN 1-55297-901-6 . OCLC 55596414 . Heidarzadeh, T. (2008). A History of Physical Theories of Comets, from Aristotle to Whipple . Springer . ISBN 1-4020-8322-X . Kepple, G. R.; Sanner, G. W. (1998). The Night Sky Observer's Guide, Volume 1 . Willmann-Bell . ISBN 0-943396-58-1 . Merritt, D. (2013). Dynamics and Evolution of Galactic Nuclei . Princeton University Press . ISBN 9781400846122 . Mohamed, M. (2000). Great Muslim Mathematicians . Penerbit UTM . ISBN 983-52-0157-9 . OCLC 48759017 . Paul, E. R. (1993). The Milky Way Galaxy and Statistical Cosmology, 1890–1924 . Cambridge University Press . ISBN 0-521-35363-7 . Sparke, L. S.; Gallagher III, J. S. (2000). Galaxies in the Universe: An Introduction . Cambridge University Press . ISBN 0-521-59740-4 . Van den Bergh, S. (1998). Galaxy Morphology and Classification . Cambridge University Press . ISBN 0-521-62335-9 . Waller, W. H.; Hodge, P. W. (2003). Galaxies and the Cosmic Frontier . Harvard University Press . ISBN 0-674-01079-5 . External links [ edit ] Find more about Galaxy at Wikipedia's sister projects Definitions and translations from Wiktionary Media from Commons Textbooks from Wikibooks Galaxies on In Our Time at the BBC . ( listen now ) Galaxies, SEDS Messier pages An Atlas of The Universe Galaxies— Information and amateur observations The Oldest Galaxy Yet Found Galaxy classification project, harnessing the power of the internet and the human brain How many galaxies are in our Universe? The most beautiful galaxies on Astronoo 3-D Video (01:46)– Over a Million Galaxies of Billions of Stars each– BerkeleyLab/animated. Bar Bulge Dark matter halo Disc Galactic halo corona Galactic plane Interstellar medium Protogalaxy Spiral arm Supermassive black hole Blazar LINER Quasar Radio galaxy X-shaped Relativistic jet Seyfert galaxy LAE LIRG Starburst galaxy BCD Pea Field galaxy Galactic tide Galaxy groups and clusters brightest cluster galaxy fossil group Interacting galaxy merger Satellite galaxy Stellar stream Superclusters Walls Void galaxy Voids and supervoids Groups and clusters Large quasar groups Nearest galaxies Polar-ring galaxies Ring galaxies Quasars Spiral galaxies Superclusters Voids Dark galaxy Faint blue galaxy Galaxy formation and evolution Intergalactic dust Intergalactic stars Intergalactic travel Book:Galaxies Category:Galaxies Portal:Astronomy v t e Galaxies Morphology Disc galaxy Dwarf galaxy elliptical irregular spheroidal spiral Elliptical galaxy Irregular galaxy barred Lenticular galaxy barred unbarred Ring galaxy Polar Spiral galaxy barred flocculent grand design intermediate Magellanic unbarred cD-galaxy Structure Active nuclei Energetic galaxies Interaction Lists See also http://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Galaxyoldid=597099156 "     Categories : Galaxies Hidden categories: Pages containing cite templates with deprecated parameters Articles containing Greek-language text Featured articles Navigation menu Personal tools Create account Log in Namespaces Article Talk Variants Views Read Edit View history Actions Search Navigation Main page Contents Featured content Current events Random article Donate to Wikipedia Wikimedia Shop Interaction Help About Wikipedia Community portal Recent changes Contact page Tools What links here Related changes Upload file Special pages Permanent link Page information Data item Cite this page Print/export Create a book Download as PDF Printable version Languages Afrikaans العربية Aragonés Asturianu Avañe'ẽ Azərbaycanca বাংলা Bân-lâm-gú Башҡортса Беларуская Беларуская (тарашкевіца)‎ Български Bosanski Brezhoneg Català Чӑвашла Čeština Cymraeg Dansk Deutsch Eesti Ελληνικά Emiliàn e rumagnòl Español Esperanto Euskara فارسی Fiji Hindi Français Frysk Furlan Gaeilge Gaelg Galego ગુજરાતી 한국어 हिन्दी Hrvatski Ido Ilokano Bahasa Indonesia Interlingua Íslenska Italiano עברית Basa Jawa Kalaallisut ಕನ್ನಡ Kapampangan ქართული Қазақша Kiswahili Kreyòl ayisyen Kurdî Лезги Latina Latviešu Lëtzebuergesch Lietuvių Limburgs Lojban Magyar Македонски Malagasy മലയാളം मराठी مصرى مازِرونی Bahasa Melayu Mirandés Монгол မြန်မာဘာသာ Nederlands नेपाली 日本語 Нохчийн Norsk bokmål Norsk nynorsk Novial Occitan Oʻzbekcha ਪੰਜਾਬੀ پنجابی Picard Piemontèis Plattdüütsch Polski Português Română Rumantsch Runa Simi Русиньскый Русский Саха тыла संस्कृतम् Shqip Sicilianu සිංහල Simple English Slovenčina Slovenščina کوردی Српски / srpski Srpskohrvatski / српскохрватски Basa Sunda Suomi Svenska Tagalog தமிழ் Татарча/tatarça తెలుగు ไทย Türkçe Türkmençe Українська اردو Vèneto Tiếng Việt Võro Winaray ייִדיש 粵語 Žemaitėška 中文 Тыва дыл Edit links This page was last modified on 25 February 2014 at 17:59. Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikimedia Foundation, Inc. , a non-profit organization. Privacy policy About Wikipedia Disclaimers Contact Wikipedia Developers Mobile view 
 Arp's Catalog Of Peculiar Galaxies Anyone Can See The Arps! Halton Arp Hubble Space Telescope Images of Arps APOD shows Arps [Observing the Arps] [Summary Data] Introduction . The Atlas Dr. Arp compiled the Atlas Atlas of the Atlas , including Arp's original tabular data. www.haltonarp.com. Observing the Arp Peculiar Galaxies Arp Observer's Club as of this writing. Atlas Wide range of field sizes - The Atlas figure Faintness of the features of interest bright familiar galaxies figure Atlas Framing - While many of the Atlas Atlas image. Finding Arps to Observe Useful Summaries to Help Find Arps: Arps in other catalogs : Messier, Herschel 400, and Hickson. 83 bright Arps (90 galaxies) in the Revised Shapley-Ames. in Arp sequence. All Galaxies Arps Sorted by Constellation . Irregularities in identifying the galaxies involved in the Arps. Where The Arps Are , a plot of locations in RA and Dec. Magnitude Distribution Willmann-Bell Arp book Nancy Roman Centre de Donn astronomiques de Strasbourg VII/192 Researchers interested in the Arps John Hibbard NRAO HI Rogues Bill Keel University of Alabama studies . Dr. Keel Hubble Heritage About this page This page is the result of a personal quest Johnson Space Center Astronomical Society Fort Bend Astronomical Club Houston Astronomical Society Dennis Webb's Home Page Dennis Webb's Email Enter your search terms Submit search form [References] Books for Arp enthusiasts: Buy Samples Blog Atlas , Atlas . Buy Samples Selected Amateur Arp Observations Arp observers share their Arp observations on their own webpages: Visual observers' Arp narratives and sketches: Ray Cashs Arp observations Bob Hills Visual Arp Observations Ron Muirs Flinthill Deep Sky Guide for the Arps: Martin Schoenball 's www.arpgalaxies.com Bruce Scodovas visual Arp observations Jim Shields Arp Sampler (also Arp Galaxy Chains ) CCD Arp images: Jim Burnell Paul and Liz Downing Ch. Dupriez Ivar Hamberg Tim Hunter and James McGaha (all 338 Arps) Tracy Knauss and Mike Morton Richard Miller (all 338 Arps) Maynard Pittendreigh (his separate home page) David Ratledge Bob Ross Dennis Webb Spectacular amateur color CCD images of Arps Arp 214 (NGC3718) Arp 77 (NGC 1097) Ken Crawford Arp 188 (The Tadpole) Russell Croman Al Kelly Arne Henden Arp 214 NGC 3718 Arp 295 Arp 216 (NGC 1316) Arps in your books and software : Bright Star Atlas Herald-Bobroff ASTROATLAS Uranometria 2000.0 lists galaxies for 82 Arps (24%). describe galaxies for 106 Arps (30%). Carnegie Atlas of Galaxies HTML or PDF . later edition Willmann-Bell includes the Arp list (Win/Mac). TheSky SkyMap file (Win). Bartels Scope-Drive . Argo-Navis . Hubble Space Telescope Images of Arps: story . 
 Size does matter: Existing Skywalker projects: (HST/ACS; download offline version (HST/ACS, download offline version ACS-COSMOS Skywalker STAGES Skywalker Skywalker publications: ADS | astro-ph astro-ph kj 
 GALAXIES Normal Galaxies Active Galaxies Peculiar and Interacting Galaxies Clusters of Galaxies Evolution and High-Redshift Galaxies Dark Matter Main Introduction Basic Data Galaxies Cosmology Particle Physics Spectroscopy Glossary and Lexicon of Term Tabular Information Graphical Relations Annual Review Articles Astrostatistics CUP Monographs Author Index New Additions Catalogs Commentary Table of Contents Web Links 
 Zur Navigation springen (Drücken Sie Enter). Zum Hauptinhalt springen (Drücken Sie Enter). Startseite Aktuelles Alle Nachrichten Pressemeldungen Medienecho Veranstaltungen Stellenangebote Über das Institut Profil Struktur Organisation Gremien Tätigkeitsberichte Zahlen und Fakten Geschichte 50 Jahre MPE in Bildern Überblick Zeitleiste Literatur, Filme Festveranstaltung MPE 50 Jahre Zentrale Einrichtungen Mechanik Ausbildung/ Praktika Elektronik Bibliothek Testlabor - Integration Testanlage Panter Mitarbeiter Kontakt Nachbarinstitute Anfahrt Forschung Hochenergie-Astrophysik Mitarbeiter Aktuelles und neue Ergebnisse Forschungsthemen Labor- und Testanlagen Projekte eROSITA Fermi GBM OPTIMA Publikationen Fr Doktoranden Infrarot-Astronomie Personnel Recent Results Research Projects Publications Meetings Internal Pages Optische und Interpretative Astronomie Mitarbeiter Wissenschaft / Forschungsthemen Projekte und Kollaborationen Publikationen Vorlesung und Seminare Master- und Doktorarbeiten Interne Opinas-Seiten Theorie Komplexe Plasmen Weitere Gruppen Dynamics Wissenschaft / Forschungsthemen Aktuelles und Highlights Projekte Veröffentlichungen Mitarbeiter Interne Gruppenseiten PhiGN Download Konferenzen Mitarbeiter Veröffentlichungen Forschung Neuste Resultate Physik des erdnahen Weltraums Aktuelles und Meilensteine Mitarbeiter Forschung Publikationen Links / Projekte Star and Planet Formation TMoX Kooperationen und besondere Einrichtungen UCB-MPE Center IMPRS Astrophysics Excellence Cluster Universe Panter Testanlage Veröffentlichungen Projekte ------ aktive Projekte : ACE Chandra CLUSTER II CONICA (NACO) Fermi GROND INTEGRAL KMOS LUCI OmegaCAM OPTIMA Pan-STARRS PARSEC PK-3 Plus Plasmakristall Rosetta SOHO SPIFFI STEREO Swift Wendelstein XMM-Newton ---------------------- zukünftige Projekte : ATHENA ARGOS ERIS eROSITA EUCLID GRAVITY HETDEX MICADO PK-4 Plasma Lab ------ beendete Projekte Öffentlichkeitsarbeit Aktuelles Veranstaltungen Informationsmaterial Multimedia Führungen Astronomie für Kinder und Jugendliche Astronomie für die Schule Nachbarinstitute Kontakt Archiv Aktuelles vor 2011 Beendete Forschungsbereiche CIPS Beendete Projekte ABRIXAS ALFA AMPTE AZUR Compton GRO Cos-B Equator-S EXOSAT Feuerrad GaAs Detektoren HASTA HELIOS HEOS-1 HEXE ISO MEGA MIR-HEXE PKE-Nefedov ROSAT PACS (Herschel) SAMPEX SMM SOFIA Stardust Ulysses Bildarchiv MPE-Reports Für Wissenschaftler Für Studenten Für Journalisten Für Besucher nur für Mitarbeiter MPG Kontakt Sitemap Intranet English Startseite Forschung Optische und Interpretative Astronomie Optische und Interpretative Astronomie Mitarbeiter Wissenschaft / Forschungsthemen Projekte und Kollaborationen Publikationen Vorlesung und Seminare Master- und Doktorarbeiten Interne Opinas-Seiten Prof. Dr. Ralf Bender Direktor der OPINAS Gruppe am MPE Telefon: +49 89 30000 3702 Email: bender@mpe.mpg.de Dr. Roberto Saglia Telefon: +49 89 30000 3916 Email: saglia@mpe.mpg.de Optische und interpretative Astronomie (OPINAS) Optische und Interpretative Astronomie Die Optische und Interpretative Gruppe des MPE und der Sternwarte der Ludwig-Maximilians-Universität wird von Ralf Bender geleitet und beschäftigt sich mit der Entwicklung kosmologischer Strukturen, im speziellen mit: Aufbau und Entstehung von Galaxien und ihrer großräumigen Verteilung , Eigenschaften der supermassereichen Schwarzen Löcher , Ursprung und Eigenschaften der dunklen Komponenten des Universums ( Dunkle Materie , Dunkle Energie ). Bild vergrößern Fig.1: VLT (oberes Bild), HET (linkes unteres Bild) und das 2m Teleskop am Wendelstein (rechtes unteres Bild). Die Hardware/Software-Aktivitäten beinhalten die Konstruktion von optischen und nah-infraroten Instrumenten, welche an Teleskopen des VLT , am HET  und am Wendelstein (siehe Fig.1) Anwendung finden sollen, sowie die Entwicklung der zugehörigen Software für die automatische Datenreduktion. Die Lehrtätigkeit in Verbindung mit der Ludwig-Maximilians Universität umfasst Vorträge im Rahmen von Physik-Vorlesungen, die Betreuung von Diplomanden, Bachelor- und Master-Studenten, und Doktoranden und die Organisation der IMPRS . OpInAs arbeitet desweiteren eng mit den assoziierten Gruppen von Ortwin Gerhard (Galaxiendynamik) , Sadegh Khochfar (Galaxiensimulationen) und Jochen Weller (Kosmologie) zusammen. 2003-2014, Max-Planck-Gesellschaft, Mnchen Archiv Impressum Seite empfehlen Druck http://www.mpe.mpg.de/opinas 
 For a better experience on your device, try our mobile site . Accessibility links Skip to content Accessibility Help BBC navigation News Sport Weather Capital Future Shop TV Radio More Search term: Galaxies Science Space Universe Sights Galaxies Galaxies Galaxies are vast collections of stars , gas, dust, and, possibly, mysterious dark matter brought together by gravity . Spiral galaxies like the Milky Way form new stars and are shaped like discs with central bulges. Elliptical galaxies look like the bulges in spiral galaxies without the surrounding disc and mainly contain old stars. Irregular galaxies do not have a standard shape and tend to have many new stars. Another type of galaxy called lenticular (also called S0) has a smaller disc, central bulge and is primarily full of older stars. Image: A Hubble Space Telescope image of the Sombrero galaxy, M104 (credit: NASA) Watch TV clips [12] Radio Programmes [1] Gravity gathers stars, gas, dust and dark matter. Use the constellation Pegasus to find interesting objects in the autumn night sky. Prof Brian Cox studies the colour of stars to understand how the Universe began. Prof Brian Cox looks back 13 billion years to distant galaxies. Prof Brian Cox takes a closer look at the spiral galaxy Andromeda. Listen now 45 mins Melvyn Bragg and guests discuss the creation and destruction of galaxies. About Galaxies A galaxy is a massive, gravitationally bound system consisting of stars, stellar remnants, an interstellar medium of gas and dust, and dark matter, an important but poorly understood component. The word galaxy is derived from the Greek galaxias (), literally "milky", a reference to the Milky Way. Examples of galaxies range from dwarfs with as few as ten million (107) stars to giants with one hundred trillion (1014) stars, each orbiting their galaxy's own center of mass. Galaxies contain varying numbers of planets, star systems, star clusters and types of interstellar clouds. In between these objects is a sparse interstellar medium of gas, dust, and cosmic rays. Supermassive black holes reside at the center of most galaxies. They are thought to be the primary driver of active galactic nuclei found at the core of some galaxies. The Milky Way galaxy is known to harbor at least one such object. Galaxies have been historically categorized according to their apparent shape, usually referred to as their visual morphology. A common form is the elliptical galaxy, which has an ellipse-shaped light profile. Spiral galaxies are disk-shaped with dusty, curving arms. Those with irregular or unusual shapes are known as irregular galaxies and typically originate from disruption by the gravitational pull of neighboring galaxies. Such interactions between nearby galaxies, which may ultimately result in a merger, sometimes induce significantly increased incidents of star formation leading to starburst galaxies. Smaller galaxies lacking a coherent structure are referred to as irregular galaxies. There are probably more than 170billion galaxies in the observable universe. Most are 1,000 to 100,000 parsecs in diameter and usually separated by distances on the order of millions of parsecs (or megaparsecs). Intergalactic space (the space between galaxies) is filled with a tenuous gas of an average density less than one atom per cubic meter. The majority of galaxies are organized into a hierarchy of associations known as galaxy groups and clusters, which, in turn usually form larger superclusters. At the largest scale, these associations are generally arranged into sheets and filaments, which are surrounded by immense voids. In October 2013, z8 GND 5296 was confirmed to be the most distant galaxy yet discovered, at a distance of approximately 13.1 billion light-years from Earth. The galaxy appears to astronomers as it was "just 700 million years after the Big Bang, when the universe was only about 5 percent of its current age of 13.8 billion years." It produces stars at a phenomenal rate of about 300 suns per year in mass and has a redshift of 7.51. Read more at Wikipedia Wikipedia edit this article at Wikipedia Continue your journey Studied with Spectroscopy Examples Milky Way Andromeda galaxy Magellanic Clouds Discovered by Edwin Hubble Contains Extrasolar planets Novae Star clusters Black holes Supernovae Nebulae Quasars Gamma ray bursts Stars White dwarfs Dark matter Neutron stars Pulsars Giant stars Habitable zones Variable stars Elsewhere on the web NASA World Book: Galaxy Astronomy Picture of the Day: Spiral galaxies in collision Galaxy Zoo BBC links Mobile site Terms of Use About the BBC Advertise With Us Privacy Accessibility Help Ad Choices Cookies Contact the BBC Parental Guidance BBC 2014 The BBC is not responsible for the content of external sites. Read more. This page is best viewed in an up-to-date web browser with style sheets (CSS) enabled. While you will be able to view the content of this page in your current browser, you will not be able to get the full visual experience. Please consider upgrading your browser software or enabling style sheets (CSS) if you are able to do so. 
